California statutes. Penal Code
 boundaries of any of the institutions mentioned in said sections or because of the increased enrollment or number of resident students at any of such institutions.

Any such licenses may be transferred from person to person, and may be transferred from premises to premises if the premises to which the license is transferred are not located nearer to the boundaries of the institution, as they exist on the date of the transfer, than the premises from which the license is transferred, except that such license may be transferred once from premises to premises located nearer by not more than 300 feet to the boundaries of the institution as they exist on the date of transfer than the premises from which the license is transferred. If a license is transferred pursuant to this section from premises to premises located nearer by not more than 300 feet to the boundaries of the institution as they exist on the date of the transfer than the premises from which the license is
 transferred, such license shall not be thereafter transferred to any other premises located nearer to the boundaries of the institution as they exist on the date of the transfer than the premises from which the license is transferred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 778.)
-------------------------------------------

172g.

(a) Every person who, within one-half mile by air line from the intersection of Sierra Vista, Pierce, and Campus Drive streets at the entrance to La Sierra College in the City of Riverside, or within one mile of the grounds or campus of Loma Linda University in the County of San Bernardino, or within one mile of the grounds of the University of Santa Clara in the City of Santa Clara, sells, or exposes for sale, any intoxicating liquor, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and
 upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), or by imprisonment in the county jail of not less than 50 days nor more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the sale or exposing or offering for sale of ale, porter, wine, similar fermented malt or vinous liquor or fruit juice containing one-half of 1 percent or more of alcohol by volume and not more than 3.2 percent of alcohol by weight nor the sale or exposing or offering for sale of beer.

(c) Distances provided in this section shall be measured not by air line but by following the shortest road or roads connecting the points in question except those applying to La Sierra College.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 43, Sec. 1.   (SB 120)   Effective June 28, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

172h.

The provisions of Sections 172, 172a, 172b, 172d and 172g of this code shall not be applied to prohibit the sale or the exposing or offering for sale of any intoxicating liquor in, or the issuance of an alcoholic beverage license for, any premises because a university has constructed and occupied since January 1, 1960, or in the future constructs, dormitories for its students which has resulted or results in the premises being prohibited by the foregoing sections from selling, exposing or offering such liquor for sale because the premises are or become thereby within the area prescribed by these sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

172j.

The provisions of Sections 172, 172a, 172b, 172d, and 172g shall not apply to the sale or exposing for sale of any intoxicating liquor on the premises of, and by the holder or agent of, a holder of a retail package off-sale general license or retail package off-sale beer and wine license issued under the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000), Business and Professions Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------

172l.

The provisions of Section 172a shall not apply to the sale or offering for sale of any intoxicating liquor on the premises of, and by the holder or agent of a holder of, a retail off-sale license, as defined in Section 23394 of the Business and Professions Code, outside one mile of the closest building of the Claremont Colleges to these premises; nor shall the provisions of Section 172a apply to the sale or offering for sale of any beer, or wine, or both, on the premises of, and by the holder or agent of a holder of, a retail package off-sale beer and wine license, as defined in Section 23393 of the Business and Professions Code,
 outside 2,000 feet of the closest building of the Claremont Colleges to these premises.

Distance provided in this section shall be measured not by air line but by following the shortest road or roads connecting the points in question.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 224.)
-------------------------------------------

172m.

The provisions of Section 172a shall not apply to the sale or the exposing or offering for sale of alcoholic beverages at premises licensed under any type of on-sale license issued pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code, which premises are located off of the grounds or campus of Leland Stanford Junior University near the City of Palo Alto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1442.)
-------------------------------------------

172n.

The provisions of Sections 172a and 172b shall not apply to the sale or exposing or offering for sale of alcoholic beverages by any off-sale licensee under the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act situated more than 2,000 feet of the boundaries of the grounds belonging to the University of California at Los Angeles on which the principal administrative offices of the university are located, as such boundaries were established as of July 1, 1959, provided the licensee has conducted a retail grocery business and has held an off-sale beer and wine license at the same location for at least 15 years.

Distances provided in this section shall be measured not by airline but by following the shortest road or roads connecting the points in question.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------

172o.

The provisions of Sections 172, 172a, 172b, 172d, and 172g shall not apply to the sale of wine for consumption off the premises where sold when the wine is sold at a bona fide public eating place by the holder of an on-sale general alcoholic beverage license or an on-sale beer and wine license issued under the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 267, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

172p.

The provisions of Section 172a shall not apply to the sale or exposing or offering for sale of beer or wine by any on-sale licensee under the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act whose licensed premises are situated more than 1,200 feet from the boundaries of Whittier College in the City of Whittier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 774, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

172.1.

No provision of law shall prevent the possession or use of wine on any state university, state college or community college premises solely for use in experimentation in or instruction of viticulture, enology, domestic science or home economics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

172.3.

The provisions of Section 172a shall not apply to the sale or exposing or offering for sale of any alcoholic beverages on the premises of, and by the holder or agent of a holder of, any off-sale license situated within 112 miles from the grounds of the University of Redlands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 760.)
-------------------------------------------

172.5.

The provisions of Sections 172 and 172a of this code shall not apply to the sale or exposing or offering for sale of alcoholic beverages by a licensee under the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act within the premises occupied by any bona fide club which is situated within one mile of the grounds belonging to the University of California at Berkeley, if the club meets all of the following requirements:

(a) The membership in the club shall be limited to male American citizens over the age of 21 years.

(b) The
 club shall have been organized and have existed in the City of Berkeley for not less than 35 years continuously.

(c) The club shall have a bona fide membership of not less than 500 members. 

(d) The premises occupied by the club are owned by the club, or by a corporation, at least 75 percent of whose capital stock is owned by the club, and have a value of not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

172.6.

The provisions of Section 172 of this code shall not apply to the sale, gift, or exposing or offering for sale of alcoholic beverages by a licensee under the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act within the premises occupied by any bona fide club which is situated within 2,000 feet of San Quentin Prison in Marin County, provided the club meets all the following requirements:

(a) The club shall have been organized and have existed in the County of Marin for not less than 25 years continuously.

(b) The club shall
 have a bona fide membership of not less than 1,000 persons. 

(c) The premises occupied by the club are owned by the club or by club members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

172.7.

The provisions of Section 172a shall not apply to the sale, gift, or exposing or offering for sale of alcoholic beverages by a licensee under the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act within the premises occupied by any bona fide club which is situated within one mile of the campus of Whittier College in the City of Whittier, or one mile or more from the campus of Leland Stanford Junior University near the City of Palo Alto, provided the club meets all the following requirements:

(a) The club shall have been organized and have existed for not less than 10 years
 continuously.

(b) The club shall have a bona fide membership of not less than 350 persons. 

(c) The club shall own the building which it occupies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

172.8.

The provisions of Section 172a shall not apply to the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, by a nonprofit organization at a municipally owned conference center located more than one but less than 112 miles from the California Institute of Technology in Pasadena.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

172.9.

The word “university,” when used in this chapter with reference to the sale, exposing or offering for sale, of alcoholic beverages, means an institution which has the authority to grant an academic graduate degree.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1588.)
-------------------------------------------

172.95.

Sections 172 to 172.9, inclusive, do not apply to sales to wholesalers or retailers by licensed winegrowers, brandy manufacturers, beer manufacturers, distilled spirits manufacturers’ agents, distilled spirits manufacturers, or wholesalers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

173.

Every Captain, Master of a vessel, or other person, who willfully imports, brings, or sends, or causes or procures to be brought or sent, into this State, any person who is a foreign convict of any crime which, if committed within this State, would be punishable therein (treason and misprision of treason excepted), or who is delivered or sent to him from any prison or place of confinement in any place without this State, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

175.

Every individual person of the classes referred to in Section 173, brought to or landed within this state contrary to the provisions of such section, renders the person bringing or landing liable to a separate prosecution and penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 637.)
-------------------------------------------

181.

Every person who holds, or attempts to hold, any person in involuntary servitude, or assumes, or attempts to assume, rights of ownership over any person, or who sells, or attempts to sell, any person to another, or receives money or anything of value, in consideration of placing any person in the custody, or under the power or control of another, or who buys, or
 attempts to buy, any person, or pays money, or delivers anything of value, to another, in consideration of having any person placed in his or her custody, or under his or her power or control, or who knowingly aids or assists in any manner any one thus offending, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three or four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 271.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Conspiracy [182. - 185.5.]

182.

(a) If two or more persons conspire:

(1) To commit any crime.

(2) Falsely and maliciously to indict another for any crime, or to procure another to be charged or arrested for any crime.

(3) Falsely to move or maintain any suit, action, or proceeding.

(4) To cheat and defraud any person of any property, by any means which are in themselves criminal, or to obtain money or property by false pretenses or by false promises with fraudulent intent not to perform those promises.

(5) To commit any act injurious to the public health, to public morals, or to pervert or obstruct justice, or the due administration of the laws.

(6) To commit any crime against the person of the President or Vice President of the United States, the Governor of any state or territory, any United States justice or judge, or the secretary of any of the executive departments of the United States.

They are punishable as follows:

When they
 conspire to commit any crime against the person of any official specified in paragraph (6), they are guilty of a felony and are punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for five, seven, or nine years.

When they conspire to commit any other felony, they shall be punishable in the same manner and to the same extent as is provided for the punishment of that felony. If the felony is one for which different punishments are prescribed for different degrees, the jury or court which finds the defendant guilty thereof shall determine the degree of the felony the defendant conspired to commit. If the degree is not so determined, the punishment for conspiracy to commit the felony shall be that prescribed for the lesser degree, except in the case of conspiracy to commit murder, in which case the punishment shall be that prescribed for murder in the first degree.

If the felony is conspiracy to commit two or
 more felonies which have different punishments and the commission of those felonies constitute but one offense of conspiracy, the penalty shall be that prescribed for the felony which has the greater maximum term.

When they conspire to do an act described in paragraph (4), they shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

When they conspire to do any of the other acts described in this section, they shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. When they receive a felony conviction for conspiring to commit identity theft, as defined in Section 530.5,
 the court may impose a fine of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

All cases of conspiracy may be prosecuted and tried in the superior court of any county in which any overt act tending to effect the conspiracy shall be done.

(b) Upon a trial for conspiracy, in a case where an overt act is necessary to constitute the offense, the defendant cannot be convicted unless one or more overt acts are expressly alleged in the indictment or information, nor unless one of the acts alleged is proved; but other overt acts not alleged may be given in evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 272.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

182.5.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) or (b) of Section 182, any person who actively participates in any criminal street gang, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 186.22, with knowledge that its members engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal gang activity, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 186.22, and who willfully promotes, furthers, assists, or benefits from any felonious criminal conduct by members of that gang is guilty of
 conspiracy to commit that felony and may be punished as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 182.

(History: Added March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 3.   Note: Prop. 21 is titled the Gang Violence and Juvenile Crime Prevention Act of 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

183.

No conspiracies, other than those enumerated in the preceding section, are punishable criminally.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

184.

No agreement amounts to a conspiracy, unless some act, beside such agreement, be done within this state to effect the object thereof, by one or more of the parties to such agreement and the trial of cases of conspiracy may be had in any county in which any such act be done.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1919, Ch. 125.)
-------------------------------------------

[185.]

Section One Hundred and Eighty-five. It shall be unlawful for any person to wear any mask, false whiskers, or any personal disguise (whether complete or partial) for the purpose of:

One—Evading or escaping discovery, recognition, or identification in the commission of any public offense.

Two—Concealment, flight, or escape, when charged with, arrested for, or convicted of, any public offense. Any person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 614.)
-------------------------------------------

185.5.

(a) A law enforcement officer shall not wear a facial covering that conceals or obscures their facial identity in the performance of their duties, except as expressly authorized in this section.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “facial covering” means any opaque mask, garment, helmet, headgear, or other item that conceals or obscures the facial identity of an individual, including, but not limited to, a balaclava, tactical mask, gator, ski mask, and any similar type of facial covering or face-shielding item.

(2) A “facial covering” does not include
 any of the following:

(A) A translucent face shield or clear mask that does not conceal the wearer’s facial identity and is used in compliance with the employing agency’s policy and procedures in Section 7289 of the Government Code.

(B) A N95 medical mask or surgical mask to protect against transmission of disease or infection or any other mask, helmet, or device, including, but not limited to, air-purifying respirators, full or half masks, or self-contained breathing apparatus necessary to protect against exposure to any toxin, gas, smoke,
 inclement weather, or any other hazardous or harmful environmental condition.

(C) A mask, helmet, or device, including, but not limited to, a self-contained breathing apparatus, necessary for underwater use.

(D) A motorcycle helmet when worn by an officer utilizing a motorcycle or other vehicle that requires a helmet for safe operations while in the performance of their duties.

(E) Eyewear necessary to protect from the use of retinal weapons, including, but not limited to, lasers.

(c) This section does not apply
 to either of the following:

(1) An officer subject to one or more of the exemptions set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 7289 of the Government Code.

(2) An officer assigned to Special Weapons and Tactics (SWAT) team units while actively performing their SWAT responsibilities.

(d) A
 willful and knowing violation of this section is punishable as an infraction or a misdemeanor.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “law enforcement officer” means a peace officer, as defined in Section 830, employed by a city, county, or other local agency as well as any officer or agent of a federal law enforcement agency or any law
 enforcement agency of another state or any person acting on behalf of a federal law enforcement agency or law enforcement agency of another state.

(f) The criminal penalties in this section shall not apply to any law enforcement officer if they were acting in their capacity as an employee of the agency and the agency maintains and publicly
 posts, no later than July 1, 2026, a written policy pursuant to Section 7289 of the Government Code.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, any person who is found to have committed an assault, battery, false imprisonment, false arrest, abuse of process, or malicious prosecution, while wearing a facial covering in a knowing and willful violation of this section shall not be entitled to assert any privilege or immunity for their tortious conduct against a claim of civil liability, and shall be liable to that individual for the greater of
 actual damages or statutory damages of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever is greater.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 125, Sec. 3.   (SB 627)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Criminal Profiteering [186. - 186.8.]

186.

This act may be cited as the “California Control of Profits of Organized Crime Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1281, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

186.1.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that an effective means of punishing and deterring criminal activities of organized crime is through the forfeiture of profits acquired and accumulated as a result of such criminal activities. It is the intent of the Legislature that the “California Control of Profits of Organized Crime Act” be used by prosecutors to punish and deter only such activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1281, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

186.2.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Criminal profiteering activity” means an act committed or attempted or a threat made for financial gain or advantage, which act or threat may be charged as a crime under any of the following sections:

(1) Arson, as defined in Section 451.

(2) Bribery, as defined in Sections 67, 67.5, and 68.

(3) Child pornography or exploitation, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 311.2, or Section 311.3 or 311.4, which may be prosecuted as a felony.

(4) Felonious assault, as defined in Section 245.

(5) Embezzlement, as defined in Sections 424 and 503.

(6) Extortion, as defined in Section 518.

(7) Forgery, as defined in Section 470.

(8) Gambling, as defined in Sections 320, 321, 322, 323, 326, 330a, 330b, 330c, 330.1, 330.4, 337a to 337f, inclusive, and Section 337i, except the activities of a person who participates solely as an individual bettor.

(9) Kidnapping, as defined in Section 207.

(10) Mayhem, as defined in Section
 203.

(11) Murder, as defined in Section 187.

(12) Pimping and pandering, as defined in Section 266.

(13) Receiving stolen property, as defined in Section 496.

(14) Robbery, as defined in Section 211.

(15) Solicitation of crimes, as defined in Section 653f.

(16) Grand theft, as defined in Section 487 or subdivision (a) of Section 487a.

(17) Trafficking in controlled substances, as defined in Sections 11351, 11352, and 11353 of the Health and Safety Code.

(18) Violation of the laws governing corporate securities, as defined in Section 25541 of the Corporations Code.

(19) Offenses contained in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 311) of Title 9, relating to obscene matter, or in Chapter 7.6 (commencing with Section 313) of Title 9, relating to harmful matter that may be prosecuted as a felony.

(20) Presentation of a false or fraudulent claim, as defined in Section 550.

(21) False or fraudulent activities, schemes, or artifices, as described in Section 14107 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(22) Money laundering, as defined in Section 186.10.

(23) Offenses relating to the counterfeit of a registered mark, as specified in Section 350, or offenses relating to piracy, as specified in Section 653w.

(24) Offenses relating to the unauthorized access to computers, computer systems, and computer data, as specified in Section 502.

(25) Conspiracy to commit any of the crimes listed above, as defined in Section 182.

(26) Subdivision (a) of Section 186.22, or a felony subject to enhancement as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 186.22.

(27) Offenses related to fraud or theft against the state’s beverage container recycling program, including, but not
 limited to, those offenses specified in this subdivision and those criminal offenses specified in the California Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction Act (Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500) of the Public Resources Code).

(28) Human trafficking, as defined in Section 236.1.

(29) A crime in which the perpetrator induces, encourages, or persuades a person under 18 years of age to engage in a commercial sex act. For purposes of this paragraph, a commercial sex act means any sexual conduct on account of which anything of value is given or received by any person.

(30) A crime in which the perpetrator, through force, fear, coercion, deceit, violence, duress, menace, or threat of unlawful injury
 to the victim or to another person, causes a person under 18 years of age to engage in a commercial sex act. For purposes of
 this paragraph, a commercial sex act means any sexual conduct on account of which anything of value is given or received by any person.

(31) Theft of personal identifying information, as defined in Section 530.5.

(32) Offenses involving the theft of a motor vehicle, as specified in Section 10851 of the Vehicle Code.

(33) Abduction or procurement by fraudulent inducement for prostitution, as defined in Section 266a.

(34) (A) Offenses relating to insurance fraud as specified in Sections 2106, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2110.3, 2110.5, 2110.7, and
 2117 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(B) Fraud offenses relating to COVID-19 pandemic-related insurance programs administered by the Employment Development
 Department. For the purposes of this subparagraph, “fraud offenses” includes the offenses specified in subparagraph (A).

(b) (1) “Pattern of criminal profiteering activity” means engaging in at least two incidents of criminal profiteering, as defined by this chapter, that meet the following requirements:

(A) Have the same or a similar purpose, result, principals, victims, or methods of commission, or are otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics.

(B) Are not isolated events.

(C) Were committed as a criminal activity of organized crime.

(2) Acts that would constitute a “pattern of criminal profiteering activity” shall not be used by a prosecuting agency to seek the remedies provided by this chapter unless the underlying offense occurred after the effective date of this chapter and the prior act occurred within 10 years, excluding any period of imprisonment, of the commission of the underlying offense. A prior act shall not be used by a prosecuting agency to seek remedies provided by this chapter if a prosecution for that act resulted in an acquittal.

(c) “Prosecuting agency” means the Attorney General or the
 district attorney of any county.

(d) “Organized crime” means crime that is of a conspiratorial nature and that is either of an organized nature and seeks to supply illegal goods or services such as narcotics, prostitution, pimping and pandering, loan-sharking, counterfeiting of a registered mark in violation of Section 350, the piracy of a recording or audiovisual work in violation of Section 653w, gambling, and pornography, or that, through planning and coordination of individual efforts, seeks to conduct the illegal activities of arson for profit, hijacking, insurance fraud, smuggling, operating vehicle theft rings, fraud against the beverage container recycling program, embezzlement, securities fraud, insurance fraud in violation of the provisions listed in paragraph (34) of subdivision (a), grand theft, money laundering, forgery,
 or systematically encumbering the assets of a business for the purpose of defrauding creditors. “Organized crime” also means crime committed by a criminal street gang, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 186.22. “Organized crime” also means false or fraudulent activities, schemes, or artifices, as described in Section 14107 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the theft of personal identifying information, as defined in Section 530.5.

(e) “Underlying offense” means an offense enumerated in subdivision (a) for which the defendant is being prosecuted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 950, Sec. 1.   (AB 1637)   Effective September 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

186.3.

(a) In any case in which a person is alleged to have been engaged in a pattern of criminal profiteering activity, upon a conviction of the underlying offense, the assets listed in subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be subject to forfeiture upon proof of the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 186.5.

(b) Any property interest whether tangible or intangible, acquired through a pattern of criminal profiteering activity.

(c) All proceeds of a pattern of criminal profiteering activity, which property shall
 include all things of value that may have been received in exchange for the proceeds immediately derived from the pattern of criminal profiteering activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1281, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

186.4.

(a) The prosecuting agency shall, in conjunction with the criminal proceeding, file a petition of forfeiture with the superior court of the county in which the defendant has been charged with the underlying criminal offense, which shall allege that the defendant has engaged in a pattern of criminal profiteering activity, including the acts or threats chargeable as crimes and the property forfeitable pursuant to Section 186.3. The prosecuting agency shall make service of process of a notice regarding that petition upon every individual who may have a property interest in the alleged proceeds, which notice shall state that any
 interested party may file a verified claim with the superior court stating the amount of their claimed interest and an affirmation or denial of the prosecuting agency’s allegation. If the notices cannot be given by registered mail or personal delivery, the notices shall be published for at least three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property is located. If the property alleged to be subject to forfeiture is real property, the prosecuting agency shall, at the time of filing the petition of forfeiture, record a lis pendens in each county in which the real property is situated which specifically identifies the real property alleged to be subject to forfeiture. The judgment of forfeiture shall not affect the interest in real property of any third party which was acquired prior to the recording of the lis pendens.

(b) All notices shall set forth the time within which a claim of interest in the property
 seized is required to be filed pursuant to Section 186.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 208, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

186.5.

(a) Any person claiming an interest in the property or proceeds may, at any time within 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice of seizure, or within 30 days after receipt of actual notice, file with the superior court of the county in which the action is pending a verified claim stating his or her interest in the property or proceeds. A verified copy of the claim shall be given by the claimant to the Attorney General or district attorney, as appropriate.

(b) (1) If, at the end of the time set forth in subdivision (a), an
 interested person, other than the defendant, has not filed a claim, the court, upon motion, shall declare that the person has defaulted upon his or her alleged interest, and it shall be subject to forfeiture upon proof of the provisions of subdivision (d).

(2) The defendant may admit or deny that the property is subject to forfeiture pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. If the defendant fails to admit or deny or to file a claim of interest in the property or proceeds, the court shall enter a response of denial on behalf of the defendant.

(c) (1) The forfeiture proceeding shall be set for hearing in the superior court in which the underlying criminal offense will be tried.

(2) If the defendant is found guilty of the underlying offense, the issue of forfeiture shall be promptly tried,
 either before the same jury or before a new jury in the discretion of the court, unless waived by the consent of all parties.

(d) At the forfeiture hearing, the prosecuting agency shall have the burden of establishing beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant was engaged in a pattern of criminal profiteering activity and that the property alleged in the petition comes within the provisions of subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 186.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1281, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

186.6.

(a) Concurrent with, or subsequent to, the filing of the petition, the prosecuting agency may move the superior court for the following pendente lite orders to preserve the status quo of the property alleged in the petition of forfeiture:

(1) An injunction to restrain all interested parties and enjoin them from transferring, encumbering, hypothecating or otherwise disposing of that property.

(2) Appointment of a receiver to take possession of, care for, manage, and operate the assets and properties so that
 such property may be maintained and preserved.

(b) No preliminary injunction may be granted or receiver appointed without notice to the interested parties and a hearing to determine that such an order is necessary to preserve the property, pending the outcome of the criminal proceedings, and that there is probable cause to believe that the property alleged in the forfeiture proceedings are proceeds or property interests forfeitable under Section 186.3. However, a temporary restraining order may issue pending that hearing pursuant to the provisions of Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court in granting these motions may order a surety bond or undertaking to preserve the property interests of the interested parties.

(d) The court shall, in making its orders,
 seek to protect the interests of those who may be involved in the same enterprise as the defendant, but who were not involved in the commission of the criminal profiteering activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1281, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

186.7.

(a) If the trier of fact at the forfeiture hearing finds that the alleged property or proceeds is forfeitable pursuant to Section 186.3 and the defendant was engaged in a pattern of criminal profiteering activity, the court shall declare that property or proceeds forfeited to the state or local governmental entity, subject to distribution as provided in Section 186.8. No property solely owned by a bona fide purchaser for value shall be subject to forfeiture.

(b) If the trier
 of fact at the forfeiture hearing finds that the alleged property is forfeitable pursuant to Section 186.3 but does not find that a person holding a valid lien, mortgage, security interest, or interest under a conditional sales contract acquired that interest with actual knowledge that the property was to be used for a purpose for which forfeiture is permitted, and the amount due to that person is less than the appraised value of the property, that person may pay to the state or the local governmental entity which initiated the forfeiture proceeding, the amount of the registered owner’s equity, which shall be deemed to be the difference between the appraised value and the amount of the lien, mortgage, security interest, or interest under a conditional sales contract. Upon that payment, the state or local governmental entity shall relinquish all claims to the property. If the holder of the interest elects not to make that payment to the state or local governmental entity, the property shall be deemed
 forfeited to the state or local governmental entity and the ownership certificate shall be forwarded. The appraised value shall be determined as of the date judgment is entered either by agreement between the legal owner and the governmental entity involved, or if they cannot agree, then by a court-appointed appraiser for the county in which the action is brought. A person holding a valid lien, mortgage, security interest, or interest under a conditional sales contract shall be paid the appraised value of his or her interest.

(c) If the amount due to a person holding a valid lien, mortgage, security interest, or interest under a conditional sales contract is less than the value of the property and the person elects not to make payment to the governmental entity, the property shall be sold at public auction by the Department of General Services or by the local governmental entity which shall provide notice of that sale by one publication in a
 newspaper published and circulated in the city, community, or locality where the sale is to take place.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a county may dispose of any real property forfeited to the county pursuant to this chapter pursuant to Section 25538.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 3.7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

186.8.

Notwithstanding that no response or claim has been filed pursuant to Section 186.5, in all cases where property is forfeited pursuant to this chapter and, if necessary, sold by the Department of General Services or local governmental entity, the money forfeited or the proceeds of sale shall be distributed by the state or local governmental entity as follows:

(a) To the bona fide or innocent purchaser, conditional sales vendor, or holder of a valid lien, mortgage, or security interest, if any, up to the amount of their interest in the property or proceeds, when the court declaring the forfeiture orders a distribution to that person. The court shall endeavor to discover all those lienholders and protect
 their interests and may, at its discretion, order the proceeds placed in escrow for up to an additional 60 days to ensure that all valid claims are received and processed.
